src/scripts/Albanian/Schwa.foma
# Copyright (C) 2021 Non-Routine LLC.  <lp@louderpages.org>

# This program is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of the GNU Affero General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation, version 3.0 of the License.

# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU Affero General Public License for more details.

# You should have received a copy of the GNU Affero General Public License
# along with this program.  If not, see <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.


source alphabet.foma 
# internal silentSchwa IS ø


define ggV gV - ø - ë;
define postSchwa [ gC+ ggV+]  - {ve} ;
define silentSchwaExceptions 
 [{dall} |  {damb} | {kat} | {nes} | {njer} | {pat} ] ø postSchwa;

define silentSchwaMorpheme sow  [  
 [ gC* ggV gC+ ø postSchwa]  |    
 [ gC* ggV gC+ a q ø ] |
 [{angør} | {angërd}] | 
 {deratø} | {deriatø}  
 - silentSchwaExceptions 
 ]; 

define silentSchwaAffix 
    {øsi} | {øs`i} ;

define Morpheme [ silentSchwaMorpheme .o. [ø -> ë]].i;
define Affix [silentSchwaAffix  .o.  [ø -> ë]].i;

define quasiLiquid  r | rr | l | ll | j;
define internalSchwaRule 
  [0:sow Letter -> || .#. _ ] .o.
  [Morpheme / StressMark @-> || .#.  _  ]
	.o. [sow:0 -> || _ ]
	.o. [ø:ë -> || gC _ quasiLiquid gC ,,
	     ø:ë -> || gC quasiLiquid _ gC ]
	.o.  [Affix  @-> || gC _ .#.]
 ; 
